Vermont, session 2025-2026, S148.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 2372 is added to read:
§ 2372. NONCOOPERATION WITH FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AUTHORITIES
VT LEG #381603 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.148
2025 Page 2 of 3
(a) As used in this section, “federal immigration authorities” means federal
agencies, departments, or employees or contractors of those agencies or
departments tasked with the enforcement of federal immigration law and
border entry, including the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, U.S.
Immigration and Customs Enforcement, and U.S. Customs and Border
Protection.
(b) No law enforcement agency, officer, or any other person acting on
behalf of a law enforcement agency may knowingly provide any information
or expend or use time, money, facilities, property, equipment, personnel, or
other resources in furtherance of any civil or criminal federal immigration
investigation or proceeding.
(c) The noncooperation requirements contained in this section shall apply
to law enforcement agencies, officers, or any other person acting on behalf of a
law enforcement agency who are involved in any situation covered by 12
V.S.A. § 7306 (noncooperation with interstate investigations of legally
protected health care activity) and 18 V.S.A. § 4254 (reporting a drug
overdose; immunity from liability).
(d) This section shall not apply to any law enforcement agency, officer, or
any other person acting on behalf of a law enforcement agency who, in the
course of normal business, is responding to:
VT LEG #381603 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.148
2025 Page 3 of 3
(1) a judicial warrant on the good faith belief that the warrant is valid in
this State; or
(2) an investigation of a criminal offense unrelated to the enforcement of
federal immigration law.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #381603 v.1